twol/all.twol
Alphabet
  а ā б в w г ғ ғ̌ ɣ̌ ɣ д δ е ê ж з ӡ z ž ȥ и й ӣ ӣ к қ л м н о п р с т θ у ӯ у̊ ф х х̌ ҳ ц ч ш ҷ 
  %- %> 
  %{Й%}:0 %{Й%}:й
  %{А%}:0 %{А%}:а
  %{ДТ%}:д %{ДТ%}:т
  %{vДТ%}:д %{vДТ%}:т
  %{vҶЧ%}:ҷ %{vҶЧ%}:ч
;

Sets

Consonant = б в w г ғ ғ̌ ɣ̌ д δ ж з z ž ӡ ȥ й к қ л м н п р с т θ ф х х̌ ҳ ц ч ш ҷ %{vДТ%} %{vДТ%} %{vҶЧ%} %{Й%};
Vowel =     а ā е ê и ӣ ӣ о у ӯ у̊ %{А%};

DGroup = а ā е ê и ӣ ӣ о у ӯ у̊ б в w г ғ ғ̌ ɣ̌ ɣ д δ ж з z ž ȥ к қ ;
TGroup = й л м н п р с т θ ф х х̌ ҳ ц ч ш ҷ ;

VoicedObstruent = б д г в δ з ж ӡ z ž ȥ ɣ̌ ɣ ҷ ғ ғ̌ ;
VoicelessConsonant = п т к ф θ с ш х х̌ ҳ ц ч қ ;

Nasal = н м ;
Liquid = л р ;
Semivowel = w й ;

Rules

"Вставка йота"
%{Й%}:0 <=> Consonant (%>) (%-) (%>) _ ;

"Вставка йота"
%{Й%}:й <=> Vowel (%>) (%-) (%>) _ ;

"Локатив местоимений"
%{А%}:а <=> Consonant (%>) (%-) (%>) _ ;

"Локатив местоимений"
%{А%}:0 <=> Vowel (%>) (%-) (%>) _ ;

"Суффикс 3sg презенса д/т"
%{ДТ%}:д <=> DGroup _ ;

"Окончание глаголов Past и Inf"
%{vДТ%}:д => [VoicedObstruent | Vowel | Semivowel] (%>) _ ;

"Окончание глаголов Past и Inf"
%{vДТ%}:т => [VoicelessConsonant | Nasal | Liquid] (%>) _ ;

"Окончание глаголов Perf"
%{vҶЧ%}:ҷ => [VoicedObstruent | Vowel | Semivowel] (%>) _ ;

"Окончание глаголов Perf"
%{vҶЧ%}:ч => [VoicelessConsonant | Nasal | Liquid] (%>) _ ;
